Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-464
Possession
of fur, pelt, or
carcass; prohibited acts.

Except as otherwise provided in the Game Law, it shall be
unlawful for any person, other than a person holding a fur-harvesting permit, a captive wildlife
permit, a fur buyer's permit, or a permit issued pursuant to section 37-461, with regard to beaver or muskrat taken pursuant to such permit, and officers and employees of the commission,
to possess the raw fur, pelt, or carcass of any fur-bearing animal protected
by the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 112, III, § 7, p. 418;

C.S.1929, § 37-307;

R.S.1943, § 37-306;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 227;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 181;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-306;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 174;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 48;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 14.